Mississippi, session 2026, SB2990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Mississippi Department of Transportation for the Town of Benoit, Mississippi, for the purpose of defraying costs associated with the construction of a walking trail for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $ 121,195.68. SECTION 2.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act shall be provided for matching funds to draw down federal funds under the Transportation Alternatives Program administered by the Mississippi Department of Transportation. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.